Rhode Island, session 2026, SB2134.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 3-8-9 of the General Laws in Chapter 3-8 entitled "Regulation of
Sales" is hereby amended to read as follows:
3-8-9. Transportation of alcoholic beverages by underage persons.
(a) Any person who has not reached his or her twenty-first (21st) birthday and who operates
a motor vehicle upon the public highways, except when accompanied by a parent, legal guardian,
or another adult who is over the age of twenty-one (21) years and related, whether by blood,
adoption or marriage, to the operator within the following degree of sanguinity: brother, sister,
grandfather, grandmother, father-in-law, mother-in-law, brother-in-law, sister-in-law, stepfather,
stepmother, stepbrother, stepsister, half-brother, half-sister, uncle, aunt, great uncle or great aunt
and, knowingly having liquor or intoxicating beverages in any form in containers, opened or
unopened, in any part of the vehicle shall be guilty of a criminal violation. The words liquor and
intoxicating beverages, as used in this section, have the same meaning as defined in chapter 1 of
this title. This section does not apply to persons between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-one
(21) who are transporting unopened alcoholic beverages in the course of their employment. No
person who is under the age of twenty-one (21) shall operate a motor vehicle upon the public
highways, while knowingly having liquor or intoxicating beverages in any form in containers,
opened or unopened, in any part of the vehicle, except when accompanied by a parent, legal
guardian, or another adult who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older and related, whether by
blood, adoption, or marriage, to the operator. The words “liquor” and “intoxicating beverages”, as

used in this section, have the same meaning as defined in chapter 1 of this title. This section does
not apply to persons between the ages of sixteen (16) and twenty-one (21) who are transporting
unopened alcoholic beverages in the course of their employment.
(b) Any person who violates subsection (a) of this section shall be subject to the following:
(1) For a first offense, a fine of not more than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) andor have
his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for not more than thirty (30) days;
(2) For a second offense, a fine of not more than five hundred dollars ($500) andor have
his or her license to operate a motor vehicle suspended for not more than ninety (90) days;
(3) For a third or subsequent offense, a fine of no less not more than five hundred dollars
($500) nor more than nine hundred and fifty dollars ($950) andor have his or her license to operate
a motor vehicle suspended for one year not more than six (6) months.
(c) The original jurisdiction for enforcement of this section shall be exclusively in the
traffic tribunal.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC003980
========
LC003980 - Page 2 of 3